Illinois, session 104th, HB3376.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 514-19 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/14-19 new)7    Sec. 14-19. IEP evaluation guidance for stakeholders. The 8State Board of Education shall provide regulatory guidance to 9relevant stakeholders regarding individualized education 10program evaluations.